Mississippi, session 2026, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Youth and Family Systems Coordination Task Force.  The purpose of this act is to establish a statewide task force to develop coordinated, research-based, multisystem strategies that complement and strengthen existing juvenile justice and behavioral health systems without altering statutory jurisdiction or judicial authority due to increased strain due to service gaps, workforce shortages, and fragmented service delivery.  Coordinated, cross-system strategies are necessary to strengthen diversion, prevention, and treatment responses that improve youth outcomes, reduce recidivism, and enhance public safety, while preserving the authority of the Youth Courts. The task force shall serve in an advisory and coordinating capacity and shall not exercise regulatory, enforcement, or judicial authority. (2)  (a)  The task force shall be composed of the following 24 members: (i)  Eight (8) individuals, with at least four (4) youth who have lived-experiences, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives as prescribed in this subsection; (ii)  Eight (8) individuals, with at least four (4) youth who have lived-experiences, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor as prescribed in this subsection; and (iii)  Eight (8) individuals, with at least four (4) youth who have lived-experiences, appointed by the Governor as prescribed under this subsection. (b)  No fewer than twelve (12) members of the task force shall be youth or individuals with lived-experience.  Adult members shall represent agencies and organizations operating under Titles 41 and 43, Mississippi Code of 1972.  No membership category shall exceed fifty-percent (50%) of the voting membership. (c)  Youth and lived-experience members shall be selected through an open nomination process.  A youth selection panel shall review nominations and recommend candidates.  Appointing authorities shall give substantial deference to youth selection panel recommendations. (3)  Members shall serve staggered two-year terms. (4)  (a)  Appointments to the task force must be made within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act.  Within fifteen (15) days thereafter, the task force shall meet and organize and  shall elect two (2) co-chairs, one (1) of whom shall be a youth or lived-experience member.  Task force members shall  select from its membership a vice chair.   The vice chair shall serve as the secretary and is responsible for keeping all records of the task force.  A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force is required.  Written notice of task force meetings shall be sent electronically to all members at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held. (b)  The task force shall meet at least once monthly. (5)  Members of the task force may not receive compensation for their service on the task force. (6)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, the Department of Mental Health shall provide administrative and logistical support and shall provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the task force to carry out its duties. (7)  The task force shall submit an annual report beginning December 1, 2027, to the Governor and Legislature. (8)  Nothing in this act shall limit the authority of Youth Courts or state agencies. (9)  If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2027.